District of Columbia statutes.
50-103

Driver safety programs.

Any food delivery service driver shall complete a driver safety course within the 1st 90 days of employment. The driver safety course shall be approved by the Bureau of Motor Vehicle Services.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-162, § 4, 37 DCR 4671

History

1981 Ed., § 40-1903.

Prior Codifications